Florida, session 2026, HB25.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Bernard Wilkes Ribault River Bridge designated;
Department of Transportation to erect suitable markers.—
(1) The bridge on Moncrief Road West over the Ribault
River in Duval County is designated as "Bernard Wilkes Ribault
River Bridge."
(2) The Department of Transportation is directed to erect
suitable markers designating Bernard Wilkes Ribault River Bridge
as described in subsection (1).
Section 2. Dickey Betts Memorial Highway designated;
Department of Transportation to erect suitable markers.—
(1) That portion of U.S. 41 between North Creek and
Blackburn Point Road in Sarasota County is designated as "Dickey
Betts Memorial Highway."
(2) The Department of Transportation is directed to erect
suitable markers designating Dickey Betts Memorial Highway as
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb25-01-c1

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
CS/HB 25 2026
described in subsection (1).
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb25-01-c1